Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-208
Opinions; when filed.

The court shall cause to be reported with as much brevity as practicable each of its decisions which reverses or modifies the judgment of the district court, and also each other decision, whether made in disposing of a motion or otherwise, which determines or modifies any theretofore unsettled or new and important question of law, or that gives construction to any provision of the Constitution or of a statute not before construed, together with such other of its decisions as are deemed to be of interest or importance.

Laws 1879, § 18, p. 85;

R.S.1913, § 1145;

Laws 1915, c. 21, § 1, p. 82;

C.S.1922, § 1074;

C.S.1929, § 27-208;

R.S.1943, § 24-208.

Opinions of appellate courts are entitled to consideration in determining the effect of their mandates. Equitable Life Assur. Soc. v. Gillan, 70 F.Supp. 640 (D. Neb. 1945).